Massachusetts, session 194th, H1867.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 24 of chapter 279 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting this third paragraph, after the second paragraph, the following 
paragraph: -  
In the case of a sentence of life imprisonment for murder in the first degree committed by 
a person on or after the person's eighteenth birthday and before the person's twenty-first birthday, 
the court shall fix a minimum term of not less than 30 years nor more than 60 years; provided, 
however, that in the case of a sentence of life imprisonment for murder in the first degree with 
extreme atrocity or cruelty committed by a person on or after the person's eighteenth birthday 
and before the person's twenty-first birthday, the court shall fix a minimum term of 40 years nor 
more than 60 years; and provided further, that in the case of a sentence of life imprisonment for 

of 2 11 murder in the first degree with deliberately premeditated malice aforethought committed by a 
person on or after the person's eighteenth birthday and before the person's twenty-first birthday, 
the court shall fix a minimum term of not less than 35 years nor more than 60 years.